Washington statutes.
RCW 15.135.090

Disposition of funds.

A produce safety account is hereby established in the agricultural local fund established in RCW 43.23.230. All moneys received under this chapter must be paid into the produce safety account and used solely to carry out the produce safety programs.

[ 2018 c 106 s 9.]